Hawaii statutes.
[§286-227] Penalty. (a) Any person
who violates this part or any rule adopted pursuant to this part shall be
subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each violation. Each
day the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. An action to
impose or collect the penalty provided in this section shall be considered a
civil action.

(b) Any person who wilfully violates this part
shall be subject to a criminal penalty of not more than $25,000 for each
violation, imprisonment for a term not to exceed five years, or both. [L 1989,
c 185, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next